District of Columbia statutes.
19-1301.09

Methods and waiver of notice.

(a)

Notice to a person under this chapter or the sending of a document to a person under this chapter must be accomplished in a manner reasonably suitable under the circumstances and likely to result in receipt of the notice or document. Permissible methods of notice or for sending a document include first-class mail, personal delivery, delivery to the person’s last known place of residence or place of business, or a properly directed electronic message.

(b)

Notice otherwise required under this chapter or a document otherwise required to be sent under this chapter need not be provided to a person whose identity or location is unknown to and not reasonably ascertainable by the trustee.

(c)

Notice under this chapter or the sending of a document under this chapter may be waived by the person to be notified or sent the document.

(d)

Notice of a judicial proceeding must be given as provided in the applicable rules of civil procedure.

History

Mar. 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-104, § 2(b), 51 DCR 208

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 109 of the Uniform Trust Code.